Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Miscellaneous Provisions as to Bridges and Ferries

280.300.
Power to build bridges over navigable waters in Kentucky.

Any person may construct a bridge over any navigable body of water of which the navigable portion lies wholly within this state, after the location and plans of the bridge have been approved by the United States chief of engineers and by the Secretary of War.

History.

853a-1.

280.310.
Powers of corporation operating bridge in Kentucky. [Repealed.]

280.320.
Failure to pay toll — School district to pay toll for children and buses. [Repealed.]

280.330.
Parking on toll bridge forbidden. [Repealed.]